Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.220

Public pest control consultant license.

For the purpose of this section public pest control consultant means any individual who is employed by a governmental agency or unit to act as a pest control consultant. No person may act as a public pest control consultant without first obtaining a license from the director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by the director and must be accompanied by a fee of forty-three dollars. Federal and state employees whose principal responsibilities are in pesticide research, the jurisdictional health officer or a duly authorized representative, public pest control consultants licensed and working in the health vector field, and public operators licensed under RCW 17.21.220 shall be exempt from this licensing provision.

[ 2021 c 244 s 6; 2008 c 285 s 20; 1997 c 242 s 7; 1991 c 109 s 40; 1989 c 380 s 17; 1986 c 203 s 4; 1981 c 297 s 20; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.